North Carolina, session 2025, HB623.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management to provide a grant to the City of Greensboro (City) to be allocated for
the following purposes:
(1) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the provision of law
enforcement, security, and transportation services associated with the City's
designation as a training camp host for the FIFA Club World Cup 2025.
(2) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for expenses associated with
the 2025 North Carolina Folk Festival.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H623-v-1*